Tennessee, session 114, HB2387.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. The annual winner of the Old Time Bluegrass and Fiddlers' Jamboree is
hereby declared the state champion fiddler in this state.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2387
012368
- 1 -